Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-263
Water; neglecting and preventing delivery; penalty.

Any person having charge of a ditch or canal used for irrigation purposes, who shall neglect or refuse to deliver water as herein provided, or any person or persons who shall prevent or interfere with the proper delivery of water to the person or persons having the right thereto, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 3, § 18, p. 853;

C.S.1922, § 8468;

C.S.1929, § 46-618;

R.S.1943, § 46-263;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 259;

Laws 1987, LB 140, § 9.

This section does not apply to persons who neglect or refuse to deliver water to those who have no right to the water. Weber v. North Loup River Pub. Power, 288 Neb. 959, 854 N.W.2d 263 (2014).